Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.250

License fees for professions, occupations, and businesses.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1427-S2.SL) ***

(1) It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each professional, occupational, or business licensing program be fully borne by the members of that profession, occupation, or business.

(2) The secretary shall from time to time establish the amount of all application fees, license fees, registration fees, examination fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and any other fee associated with licensing or regulation of professions, occupations, or businesses administered by the department. Any and all fees or assessments, or both, levied on the state to cover the costs of the operations and activities of the interstate health professions licensure compacts with participating authorities listed under chapter 18.130 RCW shall be borne by the persons who hold licenses issued pursuant to the authority and procedures established under the compacts. In fixing said fees, the secretary shall set the fees for each program at a sufficient level to defray the costs of administering that program and the cost of regulating licensed volunteer medical workers in accordance with RCW 18.130.360, except as provided in RCW 18.79.202. In no case may the secretary impose any certification, examination, or renewal fee upon a person seeking certification as a certified peer specialist trainee under chapter 18.420 RCW or, between July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2030, impose a certification, examination, or renewal fee of more than $100 upon any person seeking certification as a certified peer specialist under chapter 18.420 RCW. Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, between July 1, 2024, and July 1, 2029, the secretary may not impose any certification or certification renewal fee on a person seeking certification as a substance use disorder professional or substance use disorder professional trainee under chapter 18.205 RCW of more than $100.

(3) All such fees shall be fixed by rule adopted by the secretary in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2024 c 366 s 14; 2023 c 469 s 21; 2019 c 415 s 966; 2017 c 195 s 26; 2016 c 146 s 1; 2013 c 77 s 2; 2006 c 72 s 4; 2005 c 268 s 3; 1996 c 191 s 1; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 319.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 366: See note following RCW 71.24.847.

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Effective date—2013 c 77: See note following RCW 43.70.110.

Finding—2005 c 268: See note following RCW 18.79.202.